Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 1604, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1604. A. Each state agency may shall develop a State


Employee Suggestion Program. The purpose of the program shall be to


promote efficiency and effectiveness of state governmental


operations by providing economic incentives to employees who make


suggestions which result in direct cost savings.


B. Each state agency shall prioritize and implement viable


cost-saving suggestions and shall justify, in writing, any rejection


of cost-saving suggestions. Rejected suggestions shall be forwarded

Req. No. 3112 Page 1


to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for statewide


review and potential cross-agency adoption.


B. C. A state agency which implements a suggestion made by an


employee which results in direct cost savings to the agency of Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more may financially reward the


employee. The amount of any such award shall not exceed twenty


percent (20%) twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost savings to the


agency and shall be a minimum of ten percent (10%) of the cost


savings to the agency unless it conflicts with individual or team


award limits. No award to an individual shall exceed Twenty


Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00). No award to a team of two or more


employees shall exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). No


state employee shall be eligible to receive more than one award


payment in any single fiscal year. Each agency shall be responsible


for implementing a State Employee Suggestion Program as it deems


appropriate in accordance with the provisions of this section.


D. Each state agency shall authorize non-cash recognition and


rewards including, but not limited to, certificates, additional


leave, and professional development opportunities for suggestions


that improve efficiency without quantifiable dollar savings


including, but not limited to, those identifying fraud or abuse


leading to recoveries.





Req. No. 3112 Page 2


E. Each state agency shall authorize suggestions targeting


other entities to be jointly reviewed, with shared credit and awards


distributed proportionally based on realized savings.


C. F. Suggestions pertaining to the following areas shall not


be eligible for awards: grievances; classification and pay; matters


already recommended for study, review or summary; matters which are


the result of assigned or contracted audits, budget and fiscal


preparations studies, surveys, reviews or research; and matters


requiring the enactment of legislation. A suggester who applies for


patent rights to his or her suggestion shall not be eligible for an


award.


Suggestions made by any state employee pursuant to the State


Employee Suggestion Program shall be afforded the same protections


as provided by a confidential whistleblower program pursuant to


Section 34.301 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes or any other


public employee whistleblower act that may be created by law.


D. G. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall


promulgate rules and establish policies as necessary to implement


the State Employee Suggestion Program.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1605 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Each state agency shall annually submit a report to the


Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of

Req. No. 3112 Page 3


the House of Representatives, the Secretary of State, and the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services


detailing all cost-saving suggestions received and evaluated,


implemented measures and verified savings, recommendations for


reductions in other agencies, and a plan for achieving at least


three percent (3%) budgetary efficiencies in the upcoming fiscal


year through voluntary reductions or reallocations.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1606 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to be


designated the “Statewide Cost Savings Incentive Fund”. The fund


shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,


and shall consist of all monies received by the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services from a twenty percent (20%) portion of


realized statewide savings pursuant to Section 1604 of Title 74 of


the Oklahoma Statutes. All monies accruing to the credit of the


fund shall be budgeted and expended by the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services for the purpose of providing bonus pools for


agencies achieving aggregate reductions; agencies meeting or


exceeding reduction targets shall receive supplemental


appropriations or flexibility in carrying forward savings for


employee bonuses or operational improvements. Expenditures from the

Req. No. 3112 Page 4


fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer


against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and


payment.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1607 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created the Incentive Awards for State Employees


Committee. The Committee shall be responsible for annually


recognizing top agency performers and individual employees for cost-


saving contributions. The Committee shall annually publicly report


the total statewide savings achieved through the State Employee


Suggestion Program pursuant to Section 1604 of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. The Committee shall consist of one member to be


appointed by the Governor, one member of the Senate to be appointed


by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and one member of the


House of Representatives to be appointed by the Speaker of the House


of Representatives. All members of the Committee must be current


state employees. All members of the Committee shall serve at the


pleasure of the appointing authority. All actions of the Committee


shall require a quorum which shall be defined as a majority of the


members appointed. Staff for the Committee shall be provided by the


Governor, Senate, and House of Representatives from their existing


staff.

Req. No. 3112 Page 5


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3112 CJD 1/14/2026 11:13:05 AM



































Req. No. 3112 Page 6